Massachusetts, session 194th, H1536.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The first paragraph of section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as amended by
section 120 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by adding the following
new paragraphs:-

Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
emergency housing assistance program established herein shall be available only to residents of
the commonwealth who have resided within the commonwealth for no less than three months,
provided however that this provision shall not apply to a veteran or members of their immediate
family, a victim of domestic violence or a person whose living situation has been affected by a
fire or other natural disaster that occurred in Massachusetts.

of 2

The department shall require applicants to provide proof of residency for a period of no
less than three months. The department may require applicants to submit documentation
including, but not limited to, federal and state issued identification documents, mail, financial
statements, and bills to meet the requirements of this section. This section shall apply to
applications submitted for the emergency housing assistance program on or after the effective
date of this act.
of 2